dictionaries/uk/index.dic
адоптувати/XytN
алкаліметрувати/Xyt
анулюватися/Xyt
атестувати/XytN
бамкнутися/X
берегти/XytN
блудодіяти/Xy
бренькнути/X
буксувати/Xyt
вадити/Xy
вбрикнути/X
вгадуватися/Xyt
вгребтися/X
везтися/Xyt
вжиткувати/Xyt
взрушитися/X
вибруковуватися/Xyt
вивершитися/X
вигарцьовувати/Xyt
вигорювати/X
видихнутися/X
вижерти/X
виказати/X'
виколоти/Xl
викристалізовувати/Xyt
вилискуватися/Xyt
вим'яти/Xl
вимовити/XNJ
винишпорити/XJ
виписувати/Xyt'
випомповувати/Xyt'
випрохувати/Xyt'
вироблювати/Xyt'
висидітися/XL
висмажитися/X
вистелити/XNL
висьорбнути/X
витовмачити/XN
витрушувати/Xyt
вихитрувати/X
виціджуватися/Xyt
вичорнитися/X
виштрикнути/Xl
відблискотіти/X
відвернутися/X
відговорюватися/Xyt
відділити/XLN
відзолитися/X
відклепатися/XY
відкріпити/XLN
відлупцюватися/X
відморгувати/Xyt
відпасуватися/X
відпоститися/XL
відреставровувати/Xyt
відсердитися/X
відстобурчити/XJN
відтерпіти/X
відфоркуватися/Xyt
відцокотати/X
відшкребти/X
війнути/X
вклеюватися/Xyt
вкрутити/XLN
влягтися/X
вмотивувати/XN
волхвувати/Xyt
впинитися/X
впорядити/XNL
врівноважуватися/Xyt
всиновлювати/Xyt
встаткуватися/X
втискувати/Xyt
втрамбовуватися/Xyt
вхопитися/XL
вщемитися/X
гаркавити/XJyt
ґерґнути/X
глазурувати/XytN
гомогенізуватися/Xyt
гранулюватися/Xyt
ґуґлитися/Xyt
деамериканізувати/XytN
дейодуватися/Xyt
демілітаризуватися/Xyt
депортувати/XytN
деформуватися/Xyt
диктуватися/Xyt
дігтярувати/Xyt
доважуватися/Xyt
догвинтити/XN
додовбувати/Xyt
докеруватися/X
докупити/XLN
домащувати/Xyt
доносити/XJytLN
доперти/X
допродавати/Xyt
досиджувати/Xyt
доставити/XJN
дотопити/XLN
доховувати/Xyt
дременути/X
евакуйовувати/Xyt
емансипувати/XytN
жвяхкотіти/Xyt
з'юрмитися/X
забальзамовувати/Xyt
заболочуватися/Xyt
забур'янюватися/Xyt
завважуватися/Xyt
заводитися/XJyt
загарпунитися/X
заглиблювати/Xyt'
загостити/XN
загуститися/X
задилькотіти/X
задурманюватися/Xyt
зазублити/XNL
закарбовувати/Xyt'
заклекотати/X
закоментувати/XN
закотковувати/Xyt
закружити/XL
заламуватися/Xyt
залупитися/X
замасковувати/Xyt'
заміритися/XJ
замугикати/XY
занотовуватися/Xyt
запаморочувати/Xyt
запищати/X
запнути/XlN
запрати/X'
запустувати/X
зарифити/XN
засвідчитися/XJ
заскиртувати/XN
засмерджувати/Xyt
заспамити/XN
застояти/X'
засупонити/XJN
затиркотати/X
заточитися/XL
затурчати/X
зафрахтуватися/X
захопити/XLN
зацукритися/X
зачорнитися/X
зашліфуватися/X
заштуковуватися/Xyt
збагачуватися/Xyt
зблендерувати/XN
звабитися/XJ
звихрюватися/Xyt
звурдити/XN
згомоніти/X
здеградувати/XN
здобрювати/Xyt'
зжовувати/Xyt
зіставити/XJN
злизуватися/Xyt
зм'якшувати/Xyt'
змилювати/X
зморщитися/XJ
зневажитися/X
знеохотити/XN
знешерститися/X
зоглядітися/XJ
зректися/X
зруйнуватися/X
зцідитися/X
іммігрувати/Xyt
інспірувати/XytN
іррадіювати/Xyt
каналізуватися/Xyt
кашлянути/X
клеймити/XL
колабораціонувати/Xyt
комплектувати/XytN
контрастуватися/Xyt
кородувати/Xyt
кренити/Xyt
кублити/Xy
лакейчукувати/Xyt
листуватися/Xyt
лоскотати/Xyt
мазати/Xyt'
маслити/Xyt
металізувати/XytN
мінімізуватися/Xyt
монополізувати/XytN
мурчати/Xyt
набруднити/XN
навинути/XLNl
нагледітися/X
нагримуватися/X
надихнутися/X
надресувати/X
наелектризуватися/X
наканіфолити/XNJ
накоптити/XLN
наладжуватися/Xyt
налущувати/Xyt
намічувати/Xyt
нап'ястися/X
напластовуватися/Xyt
напродукувати/XN
нарихтуватися/X
насіяти/X'
насочувати/Xyt
наструнчити/XJN
наторгувати/XN
нахвалитися/X
начепурити/XLN
нащебетатися/X
недоквасити/XJN
недосолитися/X
німчити/Xy
оббілити/XLN
обводнюватися/Xyt
обдмухувати/Xyt
обкільцьовувати/Xyt
облизнути/X
обмахнути/X
обнародувати/Xyt'
обполіскуватися/Xyt
обскакувати/Xyt'
обступити/XLN
обхоплюватися/Xyt
оговтуватися/Xyt
одняти/Xl
оздоровити/XLN
оконтурювати/Xyt
омолодити/XLN
оповіститися/XL
опротестовувати/Xyt
оселити/XLN
осолонцювати/XN
оточуватися/Xyt
очищувати/Xyt'
панорамуватися/Xyt
пацифікувати/XytN
перебоксувати/X
перевербувати/XN
перевступити/X
перегородитися/XL
передисконтувати/XN
перезавантажуватися/Xyt
переінакшуватися/Xyt
перековувати/Xyt'
перекривитися/X
перелицьовувати/Xyt'
перемарковувати/Xyt
перемонтуватися/X
перенацілити/XN
переопромінюватися/Xyt
переперчити/XLN
перепоганити/XJN
перепроєктовуватися/Xyt
перерозміститися/XL
переслати/X'
перестрашити/XNJ
перетиньковувати/Xyt
переукомплектовувати/Xyt
перехопити/XLN
перештемпельовуватися/Xyt
піаритися/XytJ
підвищуватися/Xyt
піддивитися/XL
підклеюватися/Xyt
підкрутити/XLN
підмагнетовувати/Xyt
підмуровувати/Xyt
підпоювати/Xyt
підсаджуватися/Xyt
підсолоджуватися/Xyt
підтверджуватися/Xyt
підхімічити/XJ
плавитися/Xyt
пляшувати/Xy
побродити/XLN
повибілювати/X'
повиломлюватися/X
повискувати/Xyt
повідвалювати/X'
повмазувати/X'
погейкувати/Xyt
погребтися/X
подивуватися/X
подрібнюватися/Xyt
позаварювати/X'
позакутувати/X
позасіювати/X'
позащіпуватися/X
позмотувати/X
поколихуватися/Xyt
полімеризувати/XytN
помішувати/Xyt'
поналовлювати/X'
понукувати/X
поодпроваджувати/X
поперерізувати/X'
поплазувати/X
попоносити/XL
поприходити/XJ
порозвантажувати/X'
порозтулювати/X'
поскоритися/XL
постидити/XL
поторохкувати/Xyt
похитрувати/X
пошикуватися/X
прибуткуватися/Xyt
придаватися/Xyt
приладжуватися/Xyt
примуровувати/Xyt
припрошуватися/Xyt
пристиковуватися/Xyt
притуманювати/Xyt
пробавити/XJ
провощити/XNL
продимітися/X
прокипіти/X
пролюструвати/XN
пропагандувати/Xyt
просвердлити/XLN
проституювати/XytN
протранскрибувати/XN
прошкрябуватися/Xyt
раювати/Xy
ремонтувати/XytN
розбазарювати/Xyt
розвіювати/Xyt'
роздержавлюватися/Xyt
розкарячувати/Xyt
розкривавлюватися/Xyt
розм'якшити/XLN
розорювати/Xyt'
розполохувати/Xyt
розсвітитися/XL
розтерти/Xl
розхоплюватися/Xyt
романізувати/XytN
самокоректуватися/Xyt
секвенувати/Xyt
сканувати/XytN
скопити/XLN
скуповуватися/Xyt
спалити/XLN
сплюнути/X
споювати/Xyt'
старитися/Xyt
стрельнути/X
суміститися/X
тавтомеризуватися/Xyt
титанувати/Xyt
тратитися/XJyt
уберегтися/X
угодити/X
уземлити/XN
улеститися/X
унишкнути/X
уприємнити/XNL
усипатися/XYyO
утерпіти/X
уцяцькувати/XN
філософствувати/Xyt
хапонути/X
хряпнутися/X
чванитися/XJyt
шеретуватися/Xyt
шурхонути/X
